src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!Verb inflection
!! The Klingon language verbs inflect in persons with obligatory prefixes, then
!! the verb stem and all the optional suffixes..

LEXICON VerbalPrefixes
!!€gt-norm Verb prefixes
!!€ jIQong 1Sg+Qong+V I sleep
!!€ cholegh Sg2+Sg1O+legh+V you see me
Sg1+:jI     Verbs ;
Sg2+:bI     Verbs ;
Sg3+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1+:ma     Verbs ;
Pl2+:Su     Verbs ;
Pl3+:0     Verbs ;
Sg2+Sg1O+:cho     Verbs ;
Sg3+Sg1O+:mu     Verbs ;
Pl2+Sg1O+:tu     Verbs ;
Pl3+Sg1O+:mu     Verbs ;
Sg1+Sg2O+:qa     Verbs ;
Sg3+Sg2O+:Du     Verbs ;
Pl1+Sg2O+:pI     Verbs ;
Pl3+Sg2O+:nI     Verbs ;
Sg1+Sg3O+:vI     Verbs ;
Sg2+Sg3O+:Da     Verbs ;
Sg3+Sg3O+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1+Sg3O+:wI     Verbs ;
Pl2+Sg3O+:bo     Verbs ;
Pl3+Sg3O+:lu     Verbs ;
Sg2+Pl1O+:ju     Verbs ;
Sg3+Pl1O+:nu     Verbs ;
Pl2+Pl1O+:che     Verbs ;
Pl3+Pl1O+:nu     Verbs ;
Sg1+Pl2O+:Sa     Verbs ;
Sg3+Pl2O+:lI     Verbs ;
Pl1+Pl2O+:re     Verbs ;
Pl1+Pl2O+:lI     Verbs ;
Sg1+Pl3O+:vI     Verbs ;
Sg2+Pl3O+:Da     Verbs ;
Sg3+Pl3O+:0     Verbs ;
Pl1+Pl3O+:DI     Verbs ;
Pl2+Pl3O+:bo     Verbs ;
Pl3+Pl3O+:0     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+:pe     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2+Sg1O+:HI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Sg1O+:HI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Sg2+Sg3O+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Sg3O+:yI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Pl1O+:gho     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Pl1O+:gho     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Pl3O+:tI     Verbs ;
Imprt+Pl2+Pl3O+:tI     Verbs ;

LEXICON Reflexive
!! Reflexive suffixes mark reflexive forms
!! €gt-norm: Verb reflexives
!! jIlegh’egh 1Sg+legh+V+Refl I see myself
!! maleghchuq 1Pl+legh+V+Reciproc we see each other
+Refl:’egh   Volition?   ;
+Reciproc:chuq  Volition?   ;

LEXICON Volition
!! Volition is a marker for volition:
!! €gt-norm: verb volition
!! € leghnIS 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/nIs he sees nIS
+Foc/nIs:nIS    Change? ;
+Foc/qang:qang  Change? ;
+Foc/rup:rup    Change? ;
+Foc/beH:beH    Change? ;
+Foc/vIp:vIp    Change? ;

LEXICON Change
!! Change is marked by suffixes
!! €gt-norm: Verbal  change
!! € jIleghchoh 1Sg+legh+V+Foc/choh I see choh
+Foc/choh:choh  Cause?  ;
+Foc:qa’    Cause?  ;

LEXICON Cause
!! Cause is marked
!! €gt-norm: Verbal cause
!! € leghmoH 3Sg+legh+V+Caus cause him see
+Caus:moH   Definite?   ;

LEXICON Definite
!! definiteness is just a suffix
!! €gt-norm: verbal definiteness
!! € leghlu’ 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/lu’ he sees lu’
+Foc/lu’:lu’    Qualification?  ;
+Foc/laH:laH    Qualification?  ;

LEXICON Qualification
!! qualification the suffix
!!€gt-norm: verbal qualifications
!!€ leghchu’ 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/chu he sees chu’ 
+Foc/chu’:chu’  Aspect? ;
+Foc/bej:bej    Aspect? ;
+Foc/law’:law’  Aspect? ;

LEXICON Aspect
!! Aspects are coded in suffixes
!!€gt-norm: Verbal aspects
!!€ leghpu’ 3Sg+legh+V+Perf he finished seeing
+Perf:pu’   Honorific?  ;
+Perf:ta’   Honorific?  ;
+Cont:taH   Honorific?  ;
+Prog:lI’   Honorific?  ;

LEXICON Honorific
!! Verbs can have honorific markers
!!€gt-norm: Verbal honorifics
!!€ leghneS 3Sg+legh+V+Honor he sees honorably
+Honor:neS  Others? ;

LEXICON Others
!! And some other markers too
!!€gt-norm: Verb others
!!€ leghDI’ 3Sg+legh+V+Foc/DI’ he sees DI’
+Foc/DI’:DI’    #   ;
+Foc/chugh:chugh    #   ;
+Foc/pa’:pa’    #   ;
+Foc/vIS:vIS    #   ;
+Foc/bogh:bogh  #   ;
+Foc/meh:meH    #   ;
+Foc/Qst:’a’    #   ;
!! Verbs can always be derived into nouns with wI’:
!!€gt-norm: Deverbal nominals
!!€ leghwI’ 3Sg+legh+V+V→N+Sg+Nom his seeing
+V→N+Der/wI’:wI’    Augmentation?   ;

! Shorthands

LEXICON Reflexive?
+V:0   Reflexive   ;
+V:0    Volition?   ;

LEXICON Volition?
0   Volition    ;
0   Change? ;

LEXICON Change?
0   Change  ;
0   Cause?  ;

LEXICON Cause?
0   Cause   ;
0   Definite?   ;

LEXICON Definite?
0   Definite    ;
0   Qualification?   ;

LEXICON Qualification?
0   Qualification   ;
0   Aspect? ;

LEXICON Aspect?
0   Aspect  ;
0   Honorific?  ;

LEXICON Honorific?
0   Honorific   ;
0   Others?  ;

LEXICON Others?
0   Others  ;
0   #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
