src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!! -----
!! Verbs in Klingon language are used for both actions and adjectival properties
! editing...

LEXICON Verbs
!!€gt-norm: Basic verbs
!!€ Qong Qong+V he/she/it/they sleep(s)
!!€ jIQong Sg1+Qong+V I sleep
!!€ bIQong Sg2+Qong+V you sleep
!!€ maQong Pl1+Qong+V we sleep
!!€ SuQong Pl2+Qong+V you sleep
!!€ legh Sg3+legh+V he/she/it/they see(s) him/her/it/them
!!€ qalegh Sg1+SgO2+legh+V I see you
!!€ vIlegh Sg1+SgO3+legh+V I see him/her/it/them
!! ...
Qong+V:Qong    Reflexive?    ;
Sop+V:Sop     Reflexive?    ;
legh+V:legh    Reflexive?    ;
qIp+V:qIp     Reflexive?    ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
